Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB145.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(d) and (d.1) of the act of September 30, 1983 (P.L.160, No.39), known as the Public Official Compensation Law, are amended to read:Section 4. Members of the General Assembly.* * *(d) Subsequent annual cost-of-living adjustment for members.--(1) Except as provided under [paragraph] paragraphs (2) and (3), for the 12-month period beginning December 1, 1997, 12345678910111213141516171819202122 through November 30, 1998, and for each like 12-month period thereafter, the salary of the members of the General Assembly shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by applying the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area, for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, to the then current salary amounts. The percentage increase and the new salary amounts shall be determined jointly by the Chief Clerk of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment and shall be published by them in the Pennsylvania Bulletin within ten days of the date such determination is made.(2) The salary of the members of the General Assembly may not be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment under paragraph (1) for the period beginning December 1, 2020, through November 30, 2021. Notice of the provisions of this subsection shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin prior to December 1, 2020.(3) A member of the General Assembly may elect to reject receipt of the annual cost-of-living adjustment under this subsection if the member notifies in writing the Chief Clerk of the Senate or the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives, as applicable, no later than ten days prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment. An election by a member of the General Assembly to reject receipt of the 20250SB0145PN0092 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adjustment shall be irrevocable during the member's term of office.(d.1) Subsequent annual cost-of-living adjustment for officers and leaders.--(1) Except as provided under [paragraph] paragraphs (2) and (3), for the 12-month period beginning December 1, 1997, through November 30, 1998, and for each like 12-month period thereafter, the additional compensation of the officers and leaders of the General Assembly shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by applying the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area, for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, to the then current compensation. The percentage increase and the new compensation amounts shall be determined jointly by the Chief Clerk of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment and shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 20 days immediately prior to each cost-of-living increase taking effect.(2) The additional compensation of the officers and leaders of the General Assembly may not be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment under paragraph (1) for the period beginning December 1, 2020, through November 30, 2021. Notice of the provisions of this subsection shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin prior to December 1, 20250SB0145PN0092 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 2020.(3) An officer or leader of the General Assembly may elect to reject receipt of the annual cost-of-living adjustment under this subsection if the officer or leader notifies in writing the Chief Clerk of the Senate or the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives, as applicable, no later than ten days prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment. An election by an officer or leader of the General Assembly to reject receipt of the adjustment shall be irrevocable during the officer's or leader's term of office as a member of the General Assembly.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0145PN0092 - 4 - 123456789101112